Utah statutes.
26-50-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Committee" means the advisory committee created by the executive
director pursuant to Section 26-50-202.
(2)  "Fund" means the Traumatic Brain Injury Fund created in Section
26-50-201.
